Montana, session 2025, HB50.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

Section 1. Section 50-32-609, MCA, is amended to read:
"50-32-609. Good Samaritan and parental protections. (1) The provisions of 45-5-626, 45-9-102,
45-9-107, and 45-10-103 do not apply to:
(a) a person who, acting in good faith, seeks medical assistance for another person who is
experiencing an actual or reasonably perceived drug-related overdose if the evidence supporting an arrest,
charge, or prosecution was obtained as a result of the person's seeking medical assistance for another person;
or
(b) a person who experiences a drug-related overdose and is in need of medical assistance if the
evidence supporting an arrest, charge, or prosecution was obtained as a result of the drug-related overdose
and the need for medical assistance.
(2) The provisions of 45-9-102, 45-9-107, and 45-10-103 do not apply to:
(A) a pregnant woman seeking or receiving:
(a)(I) evaluation, treatment, or support services for a substance use disorder; or
(b)(II) prenatal health care; OR
(B) A WOMAN SEEKING POSTPARTUM HEALTH CARE UP TO 12 MONTHS AFTER THE DELIVERY OF HER CHILD.
(3) The provisions of 45-5-601(2)(a) do not apply to a person reporting a crime under 45-5-502 or
45-5-503.
(4) A person's pretrial release, probation, furlough, supervised release, or parole may not be
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 50

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB0050.2
revoked based on an incident for which the person would be immune from arrest, charge, or prosecution under
this section.
(5) A person's act of providing first aid or other medical assistance to a person who is experiencing
an actual or reasonably perceived drug-related overdose may be used as a mitigating factor in a criminal
prosecution for which immunity is not provided under this section.
(6) A parent's positive drug test may not be the sole factor used to:
(a) begin a child abuse and neglect investigation under Title 41, chapter 3, part 2;
(b) place a child in protective care pursuant to Title 41, chapter 3, part 3;
(c) initiate abuse and neglect proceedings as provided for in Title 41, chapter 3, part 4; or
(d) terminate parental rights as provided for in Title 41, chapter 3, part 6.
(6)(7) This section may not be construed to:
(a) bar the admissibility of evidence obtained in connection with the investigation and prosecution
of other crimes or violations committed by a person who otherwise qualified for limited immunity under this
section;
(b) limit, modify, or remove immunity from liability currently available to public entities, public
employees, or prosecutors or by law; or
(c) create a new cause of action or other source of criminal liability for a pregnant woman with a
substance use disorder who does not seek or receive evaluation, treatment, or support services for a substance
use disorder."
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 50